Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1681.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Subject to the requirements of article IV, part 1, section 1, Constitution of Arizona, title 36, chapter 28.1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 36-2823, to read: START_STATUTE36-2823. Issuance of additional nonprofit medical marijuana registration certificates; qualifications; timeline; definitions A. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, a marijuana establishment that is in good standing with the department and that is not currently a dual licensee may apply to the department for a nonprofit medical marijuana dispensary registration certificate. B. after a qualified applicant submits a complete application and the application fee, the department shall issue a nonprofit medical marijuana dispensary registration certificate to the qualified applicant.  The department shall accept applications beginning August 1, 2026 and shall issue the nonprofit medical marijuana dispensary registration certificates before October 1, 2026. C. A marijuana establishment that obtains a nonprofit medical marijuana dispensary registration certificate pursuant to this section is a dual licensee. D. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, a person that becomes a dual licensee pursuant to this section: 1. Is authorized to dispense marijuana to registered qualifying patients and registered designated caregivers only at the same retail location from which the person sells marijuana and marijuana products to consumers pursuant to chapter 28.2 of this title. 2. Is not authorized to operate any additional off-site cultivation or off-site manufacturing locations. E. For the purposes of this section, "dual licensee", "good standing" and "marijuana establishment" have the same meanings prescribed in section 36-2850. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Requirements for enactment; three-fourths vote Pursuant to article IV, part 1, section 1, Constitution of Arizona, section 36-2823, Arizona Revised Statutes, as added by this act, is effective only on the affirmative vote of at least three-fourths of the members of each house of the legislature. Sec. 3. Emergency This act is an emergency measure that is necessary to preserve the public peace, health or safety and is operative immediately as provided by law.